DI-587

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DIATE-01

DTC

B0 137/71 Shortin P/T Squib LH Circuit
(to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P/T squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTCBO0 137/71 isrecorded when a ground shortis detected in the P/T squib LH circuit.

* Airbag sensorassembly malfunction

e FloorNo. 1 wire
* Dashwire (Bench seat)

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Seatbeltpretensioner LH (P/T squib LH
¢ Shortin P/T squib LH circuit (to ground) . P ( g )
. . * Airbag sensorassembly
B0137/71  P/T squib LH malfunction

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-571.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check seat type.

CHECK:

Confirm that the type of the front seat.

OK:

A: Separate seat
B: Bench seat

2

Go to step 6.
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3CheckfloorNo. 1 wire(P/TsquibLH circuit).

FloorNo. 1 Wire CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and PL+ of
CD :IA'rba thefloorNo. 1 wire connectoronthe seatbelt pretensioner LH
P/T SquibLH Sonsor (P/T squib LH) side.

Assembly OK:
Q] :l Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

mPL+
Qe

HO8392 H08396

U‘ NG> pairorreplacefloorNo. 1 wire.
HO01016

OK
~_—
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4 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Floor No. 1 Wire

CD QJ—_] Airbag
P/T Squib LH Sensor
[g :| Assembly
PL+ @ PL- ON
DTC B0137/71
DLC3
i_niil
L /]
—
CG TC

H01017
H02139 AB0119

H10600 H01084 H10631
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PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Usingaservice wire, connect PL+ and PL- of the floor No.
1 wire connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T
squib LH) side.

() Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO 137/71 isnotoutput.

HINT:

Codesotherthancode B0 137/71 may be output atthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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5 | Check P/T squib LH.

—_—

E[D:] Airbag

P/T Squib LH Sensor
:l Assembly

H01018
ABO118 AB0119
H10600 HO1084

DTC B0137/71

H10632

@

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)
connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO0 137/71 is not output.
HINT:
Codesotherthancode B0 137/71 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace seat belt pretensioner LH
(P/T squib LH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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6 [Check P/T squib LH circuit.

P/T Squib LH

] —1—]

N

PL+

H21545
H08392

]Airbag
[]sensor

]Assembly

H21710
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CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the body ground and PL+ of
the connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)
side between the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pre-
tensioner LH (P/T squib LH).

OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

)

Go to step 9.
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7 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

P/T Squib LH
< i:l E [D ]Airbag
Sensor
[Q ]Assembly
PL+ PL-
ON

H21549
H02139 AB0119
H10600 H01079

%

DTC B0137/71

H21711
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PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Using a service wire, connect PL+ and PL- of the connec-
tor on the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH) side
between the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt
pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH).

(c) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.

(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTC B0137/71 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0137/71 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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8 |[Check P/T squib LH.
PREPARATION:
P/T Squib LH (@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
< 1] 11 1 éirbag (b) Disconnect the negative () terminal cable from the bat-
i Agggr?:bly tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
- (c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner LH (P/T squib LH)
connector.
(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.
ON CHECK:
@ (@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
DLC3 DTC B0137/71 (c)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
: seconds.
m (d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
=> conds.
e TC (e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).
H21547 O_K
H110606 H01079 H21712 DTC B0137/71 is not output.
HINT:

Codes other than code B0137/71 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace seat belt pretensioner LH

(P/T squib LH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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9 [Check floor No. 1 wire.
Floor No. 1 Wire  pash Wire PREPARATION:
Disconnect the floor No. 1 wire connector from the dash wire.
<] ]Airba CHECK:
. — - ]Sensgr Measure the resistance between the body ground and PL+ of
P/T Squib LH Assembly the floor No. 1 wire connector on the seat belt pretensioner LH

(P/T squib LH) side.
OK:

PL+ Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher
QNSZON

H08392

H21548 I NG> Repair or replace floor No. 1 wire.

OK

Repair or replace dash wire.
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